Utah statutes.
38-1-34.   Abuse of database -- Penalty.
(1)  A person abuses the database if that person records a notice in the
database:
(a)  without a good faith basis for doing so;
(b)  with the intent to exact more than is due from the project owner or any
other interested party; or
(c)  to procure an unjustified advantage or benefit.
(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is liable to the owner of the
construction project, an original contractor, a subcontractor, or any
interested party who is affected by the notice for twice the amount of the
actual damages incurred by such party or $2,000, whichever is greater.
